Maryland, session 2026, HB1387.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
20–512.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the Fund shall pay to a
fund producer of a policyholder to whom a policy is issued a commission:
(1) for private passenger auto insurance issued by the Fund, at a rate
determined by the Fund but [not less than 10% 5% and] not to exceed 15% of the total
premium; and
(2) for any other insurance issued by the Fund, at a rate determined by the
Fund but not to exceed 10% of the total premium.
(b) The Fund may not pay a commission:
(1) on a fully earned basis;
(2) if a prospective insured fails to qualify under § 20–502 of this subtitle;
or
– 1 –

Ch. 795 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) if a prospective insured’s initial payment to the Fund, a fund producer,
or premium finance company is not honored; OR
(4) ON A POLICY WRITTEN DIRECTLY BY THE FUND WITHOUT THE
INVOLVEMENT OF A FUND PRODUCER.
(c) If a policy issued by the Fund is canceled, the Fund shall refund any unearned
commissions.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –